Massachusetts, session 194th, H2394.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 5S the following section:-
Section 5T. For the purposes of this section “disposable food container” shall mean
single-use disposable products used in the restaurant, food service, and food sales industries for
serving, transporting, or packaging prepared, ready-to-consume, or uncooked food or beverages.
This includes but is not limited to plates, cups, bowls, trays, hinged or lidded containers, straws,
cup lids, and utensils. “Food establishment” shall mean an operation that stores, prepares,
packages, serves, vends, or otherwise provides food for human consumption, including but not
limited to any establishment requiring a permit to operate in accordance with the State Food
Code. “Polystrene” shall mean a synthetic resin which is a polymer of styrene, used chiefly as
lightweight rigid foams and solid containers. “Prepared food” shall mean any food or beverage
prepared for consumption on the food provider's premises, using any cooking or food preparation
of 3

technique. This does not include any raw uncooked meat, fish or eggs unless provided for
consumption without further food preparation. “Retail establishment” shall mean any
commercial business facility that sells goods directly to the consumer including but not limited to
grocery stores, pharmacies, liquor stores, convenience stores, restaurants, retail stores and
vendors selling clothing, food, and personal items
(b) Except as provided herein, on or after August 1, 2026, food establishments shall be
prohibited from dispensing food to customers in disposable food service containers made from
polystyrene.
(c) Except as provided herein, on and after August 1, 2026, retail establishments shall be
prohibited from selling or distributing polystyrene food service ware to customers.
(d) The department shall promulgate regulations for the enforcement of this section. Said
regulations shall establish (i) fines not to exceed one thousand dollars for any single violation
and (ii) a process for deferments, in accordance with the following:
(1) Upon written application to the health department of the town or city in which it
operates, and upon showing by the food establishment that the conditions of this provision would
cause undue hardship, the municipal health department or its designee may defer application of
this provision for a food establishment for a one year period. An “undue hardship” shall mean a
situation unique to the food establishment where there are no reasonable alternatives to the use of
polystyrene disposable food service containers and compliance with this provision would cause
significant economic hardship to that food establishment.
of 3

(2) A food establishment granted a deferment must reapply prior to the end of that period
and demonstrate continued undue hardship, if it wishes to have the deferment extended.
Deferments may only be granted for intervals not to exceed one year.
(3) The application for a deferment or extension thereof shall include all information
necessary for the municipal health department or its designee to make its decision, including but
not limited to, documentation showing the factual support for the claimed deferment. The
municipal health department or its designee may require the applicant to provide such additional
information that it reasonably deems necessary to render a decision.
(4) The municipal health department or its designee may approve the deferment
application, in whole or in part, with or without conditions.
of 3